Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-361.02
Rebates; circumventing; enforcement; penalty.

Any agent who is found to have obtained a license or renewal primarily to circumvent enforcement of section 44-361 shall, in addition to any other penalty imposed by law, be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1955, c. 175, § 4, p. 504;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 232.